Utah statutes.
9-7-504.   Library board duties -- Library fund deposits.
(1)  The library board of directors shall, with the approval of the county
executive and in accordance with county ordinances, policies, and procedures:
(a)  be responsible for:
(i)  the expenditure of the library fund;
(ii)  the construction, lease, or sale of library buildings and land; and
(iii)  the operation and care of the library; and
(b)  purchase, lease, or sell land, and purchase, lease, construct, or sell
buildings, for the benefit of the library.
(2)  The board has those powers and duties as prescribed by county ordinance,
including establishing policies for collections and information resources that
are consistent with state and federal law.
(3) (a)  All tax money received for the library shall be deposited in the
county treasury to the credit of the library fund, and may not be used for any
purpose except that of the county library.
(b)  All money collected by the library shall be deposited to the credit of
the library fund.
